Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-402 Scope. Except where made
expressly applicable to domestic reciprocal insurers, the provisions of this
part shall apply to all authorized reciprocal insurers. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next